Hawaii statutes.
[§482B-9] Severability. If any
provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is
held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications
of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable. [L
1989, c 221, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next